District of Columbia statutes.
50-1802

Use of safety belts required; exceptions.

(a)

Except as provided in Chapter 17 of this title, the driver and all passengers in a motor vehicle shall wear a properly adjusted and fastened safety belt while the driver is in control of the vehicle.

(b)

This section does not apply to operators or passengers under the following circumstances:

(1)

Riders in a motor vehicle manufactured before July 1, 1966;

(2)

Riders who possess a written verification from a licensed physician that the rider is unable to wear a safety belt for medical reasons;

(3)

Riders who are passengers in a vehicle if all seating positions with seat belts in the vehicle are occupied by other persons. The driver shall insure that children 16 years of age and under have preference to seating positions with seat belts over persons more than 16 years of age; or

(4)

Operators of taxicabs who possess valid taxicab licenses while picking up or transporting passengers for hire between the hours of 6:00 p.m. and 6:00 a.m.

(c)

Two years following June 9, 2001, the District of Columbia Taxicab Commission shall submit to the Council a report on the impact on driver safety of subsection (b)(4) of this section.

Dec. 12, 1985, D.C. Law 6-73, § 3, 32 DCR 6344
Mar. 7, 1992, D.C. Law 9-57, § 3, 38 DCR 7283
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-244, § 2(a), 44 DCR 1155
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-307, § 4, 48 DCR 600
D.C. Law 13-307, in subsec. (b), deleted “or” at the end of par. (2), substituted “; or” for the period at the end of par. (3), and added par. (4); and added subsec. (c).
1981 Ed., § 40-1602.

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-1801.

Expiration of Law 6-73